Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2331
Choice of law as to execution.

A written will is valid if executed in compliance with section 30-2327 or 30-2328 or if its execution complies with the law at the time of execution of the place where the will is executed or of the place where at the time of execution or at the time of death the testator is domiciled, has a place of abode or is a national.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 53, UPC § 2-506.